New York, session 2025-2026, S8233.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs 1 and 3 of subdivision i of section 311 of the 2 New York city charter, paragraph 1 as amended by chapter 110 of the laws 3 of 2024 and paragraph 3 as amended by chapter 569 of the laws of 2022, 4 are amended to read as follows: 5 1. agencies may make procurements of goods, services and construction 6 for amounts not exceeding one million five hundred thousand dollars from 7 businesses certified as minority or women-owned business enterprises 8 pursuant to section thirteen hundred four of the charter and from 9 special veteran emerging business enterprises without a formal compet- 10 itive process. 11 3. the rule or rules promulgated to implement paragraph one of this 12 subdivision shall provide that the city shall, commencing on the first 13 of October of the first full calendar year following the adoption of 14 such rule or rules, submit an annual report to the governor and the 15 state legislature of the total number and total dollar value of procure- 16 ments of goods and services for amounts not exceeding the dollar amount 17 threshold for making procurements without a formal competitive process 18 as established by rule pursuant to paragraph one of this subdivision 19 from: 20 (i) businesses certified as minority or women-owned business enter- 21 prises pursuant to section thirteen hundred four of the charter; 22 (ii) special veteran emerging business enterprises; 23 (iii) all other businesses; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13241-01-5 S. 8233 2 1 [(iii)] (iv) information about the number of businesses certified as 2 minority or women-owned business enterprises pursuant to section thir- 3 teen hundred four of this charter or special veteran emerging business 4 enterprises that are able to perform the specific type and scale of work 5 involved in each procurement. 6 § 2. Subdivision i of section 311 of the New York city charter is 7 amended by adding a new paragraph 4 to read as follows: 8 4. For purposes of this subdivision, the term "special veteran emerg- 9 ing business enterprise" means a business enterprise that is a certified 10 service-disabled veteran-owned business enterprise as defined in subdi- 11 vision one of section forty of the veterans' services law and that is 12 certified as an emerging business enterprise pursuant to section thir- 13 teen hundred four of the charter. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.